District of Columbia statutes.
1-1504.02

Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1980

(Effective January 10, 1981).Statute text

Prepared by the Mayor and transmitted to the Council of the District of Columbia on October 14, 1980, pursuant to the provisions of Section 422 (12) of the District Charter.

EMPLOYEE, HEALTH, SAFETY AND COMPENSATION

PART A:

PART A: SAFE ANDfh HEALTHY WORK ENVIRONMENT FOR D.C. EMPLOYEES

I.

Establishment

There is established in the Department of Employment Services (DOES) in the Office of Occupational Safety and Health a Division of Public Sector Safety.

II.

Purpose

The Division of Public Sector Safety is established to administer the worker health and safety program for District of Columbia employees authorized by Title XX of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of 1978 (D.C. Law 2-139) exclusive of Section 2007, to assure a safe working environment for District employees.

III.

Functions

(a)

Develops, implements and manages comprehensive occupational safety and health programs for employees and general public users of District Government facilities, which include employee safety and health, fire safety, motor vehicle safety, safety of non-employee users of city facilities and services, contractor safety, and protection of District Government property. Provided, however, that nothing in this Part shall be construed as affecting the responsibility of the Fire Chief to enforce the D.C. Fire Code; and provided further, that responsibility for the licensing and inspection of vehicles shall continue in the Department of Transportation.

(b)

Issues directives, manuals and guidelines for the operation of the safety and health programs consistent with applicable standards promulgated by the U.S. Department of Labor under the provisions of the Occupational Safety and Health Act, and other applicable standards.

(c)

Monitors and evaluates adequacy and effectiveness of safety procedures and practices of District agencies through audits and inspections.

(d)

Evaluates technological developments in the safety field (i.e., equipment, devices, and techniques to eliminate or minimize hazards) for possible application.

(e)

Conducts promotional campaigns to stimulate worker interest in accident preventions and to train and motivate work supervisors, visitors, etc., in accident prevention concepts, practices and techniques.

(f)

Establishes appropriate systems and procedures for accident reporting; maintains and analyzes records of all occupational accidents and illnesses occurring within agencies; studies safety problems and recommends to managers actions to correct undesirable conditions or unsafe practices.

IV.

Transfers

The powers, duties and functions authorized by Title XX of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of 1978 (D.C. Law 2-139), exclusive of those in Section 2007 and delegated to the District of Columbia Office of Personnel by Mayor's Order No. 80-78, issued February 27, 1980, and presently administered in the Division of Compensation Programs are hereby transferred to the Department of Employment Services.

V.

Resources

All positions, property, records and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations and other funds available or to be made available relating to the functions assigned herein are hereby transferred to the Office of Occupational Safety and Health in the Department of Employment Services.

PART B:

EMPLOYEE HEALTH SERVICES

I.

Establishment

There is established in the Department of Human Services, in the Preventive Health Services Administration an Office of Employee Health Services.

II.

Purpose

The Office of Employee Health Services is established to administer the provisions of Section 2007 of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of 1978 (D.C. Law 2-139) [§ 1-620.07], to assure that District employees have access to appropriate medical and prevention health services.

III.

Functions

(a)

Provides on-site emergency medical or first aid services to employees in major District Government facilities, either as a part of existing clinical services established through other programs or created specifically for the purpose within the limits of available resources.

(b)

Provides a counseling program for troubled employees, offering initial review and referral for treatment as appropriate.

(c)

Provides, through intra-District agreements with appropriate agencies, services which are associated with District Government employment, such as preemployment or periodic physical examinations, or fitness-for-duty examinations.

(d)

Carries out government-wide prevention health programs to encourage awareness of good health practices on the part of District employees.

IV.

Transfers

The powers, duties and functions authorized by Section 2007 of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of 1978 (D.C. Law 2-139) [§ 1-620.07] and delegated to the District of Columbia Office of Personnel by Mayor's Order No. 80-78, issued February 27, 1980 and presently administered by the Division of Compensation Programs, are hereby transferred to the Department of Human Services.

V.

Resources

All positions, property, records and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations and other funds available or to be made available relating to the function assigned herein are hereby transferred to the Preventive Services Administration of the Department of Human Services.

PART C:

D.C. DISABILITY COMPENSATION

I.

Establishment

There is established in the Department of Employment Services within the Office of Workers Compensation a Division of Public Sector Compensation.

II.

Purpose

The Division of Public Sector Compensation is established to implement a disability compensation program for employees of the District of Columbia Government, as authorized by Title XXIII of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act (D.C. Law 2-139).

III.

Functions

(a)

Establishes policies and procedures for operation of Title XXIII; promulgates and issues instructions, forms, and internal issuances and directives.

(b)

Reviews and takes final action on claims brought under applicable statute or regulations including requests for reconsideration that follow hearings or other special considerations.

(c)

Maintains a master file and appropriate permanent records.

(d)

Develops and maintains working agreements with the U.S. Public Health Service, designated physicians, the U.S. Office of Vocational Rehabilitation, and other public and private organizations as required.

(e)

Monitors the adequacy and effectiveness of medical services under Title XXIII, and develops guidelines for the determination of disabilities and for professional fees.

(f)

Provides technical assistance on D.C. Law 2-139, Title XXIII, to District Government agencies, labor organizations and others.

IV.

Transfers

The powers, duties and functions authorized by Title XXIII of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of 1978 (D.C. Law 2-139) and delegated to the District of Columbia Office of Personnel by Mayor's Order No. 79-184, and presently administered in the Division of Compensation Programs, are hereby transferred to the Department of Employment Services.

V.

Resources

All positions, property, records and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations and other funds available or to be made available relating to the functions assigned herein are hereby transferred to the Office of Workers Compensation in the Department of Employment Services.

VI.

Effective Date

This Plan shall become effective in accordance with Section 422 (12) of P.L. 93-198.

2001 Ed., Title 1, Chapter 15, Subchapter IV, Part B.

Prior Codifications